Utah statutes.
70-3a-203.   Fees.
(1) (a)  A fee shall be determined by the division in accordance with the
requirements of Section 63J-1-504, but may not exceed $250 annually for
electronic registration of a mark in a single class.
(b)  A person who pays the annual fee for the electronic registration of a
mark may register additional classes for the same mark for an additional fee
not to exceed $25 annually.
(2)  A fee approved pursuant to this section shall be deposited in a
restricted account within the General Fund known as the Commerce Service Fund.
